Missouri, session 2026, SB1306.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 192, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 192.378, to read as
follows:
192.378. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Department", the department of health and senior
services;
(2) "Health advocate", an employee or contractor of
the department who works with pregnant patients on their
behalf by assisting the patients in navigating the health
care system and communicating with the health care
professionals providing care for the patients;
(3) "Program", the health advocate program established
in subsection 2 of this section.
2. Subject to appropriation, the department shall
establish a health advocate program in which the department
provides a health advocate to any pregnant patient who
requests a health advocate.
3. Any resident of this state who is pregnant may
request a health advocate through the program. The
department shall assign a health advocate to the resident

SB 1306 2
within twenty days of any such request. The assignment
shall continue for the duration of the pregnancy.
4. A health advocate for the program may be licensed
or certified as a health care professional or patient
advocate, but licensure or certification shall not be
required to serve as a health advocate in the program.
5. The department shall determine the duties the
health advocate shall perform for the patients in the
program during their pregnancy. The duties shall include,
but not be limited to, the following:
(1) Assessing the needs, culture, and medical
background of the patient and the patient's family;
(2) Preparing a birthing plan for the family;
(3) Being present in the birthing room with the family
or on call during the birthing process;
(4) Advocating for the patient if any conflict occurs
between or among the patient, the health care professionals
caring for the patient, and the family members of the
patient; and
(5) Documenting any conflict described in subdivision
(4) of this subsection and monitoring and documenting the
outcome of the conflict.
6. Every licensed physician who provides obstetrical
or gynecological care to a pregnant patient in this state
shall inform the patient about the availability of the
program.
7. To raise awareness and to educate the public, the
department shall:
(1) Collect and distribute resource materials to
educate the public about the program;
(2) Develop and distribute educational materials,
including, but not limited to, videos, brochures, and other

SB 1306 3
media, as part of a comprehensive public awareness campaign
about the program;
(3) Make such educational materials available through
state and local public health clinics, public hospitals, and
private physicians for distribution to their patients. Such
materials shall also be available to the public on the
department's website; and
(4) Establish a toll-free telephone number to provide
information on the program and receive requests from
patients for health advocates.
8. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "Health Advocate Program Fund", which shall consist of
moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any
gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from
federal, private, or other sources. The state treasurer
shall be custodian of the fund. The department shall
administer the fund in accordance with the provisions of
this section. In accordance with sections 30.170 and
30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The
fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used solely by the department
as provided in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
9. The department shall promulgate all necessary rules
and regulations for the administration of this section. Any

SB 1306 4
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
section 536.010, that is created under the authority
delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
10. The provisions of sections 23.250 to 23.298 shall
not apply to the provisions of this section.
✓